Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 20268-1101.01
Fair practice or ethical rules or standards; federal rules and regulations; federal acts; adoption.

For purposes of the Securities Act of Nebraska:

(1) Fair practice or ethical rules or standards promulgated by the Securities and Exchange Commission, the Financial Industry Regulatory Authority, or a self-regulatory organization approved by the Securities and Exchange Commission means such practice, rules, or standards as they existed on January 1, 2026;

(2) Federal rules and regulations adopted under the Investment Advisers Act of 1940 or the Securities Act of 1933 means such rules and regulations as they existed on January 1, 2026; and

(3) Securities Act of 1933, Securities Exchange Act of 1934, Investment Advisers Act of 1940, Investment Company Act of 1940, Commodity Exchange Act, and the federal Interstate Land Sales Full Disclosure Act means the acts as they existed on January 1, 2026.

Laws 2017, LB148, § 2;

Laws 2019, LB259, § 2;

Laws 2020, LB909, § 13;

Laws 2021, LB363, § 13;

Laws 2022, LB707, § 21;

Laws 2023, LB92, § 14;

Laws 2024, LB1074, § 46;

Laws 2025, LB251, § 14;

Laws 2026, LB717, § 11.
February 26, 2026